test/src/morphology/N-keeles_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeeˊles contract stem valehtelija: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Nom: ǩeeˊles
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Gen: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Acc: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Loc: ǩeâllsest
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Com: ǩeâllsin
     ǩeeˊles+N+Ess: ǩeâllsen
     ǩeeˊles+N+Par: ǩeâllsed
     ǩeeˊles+N+Sg+Abe: ǩeâllaztää
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Nom: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Acc: ǩeâllsid
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Ill: ǩeâllsid
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Loc: ǩeâllsin
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Com: ǩeâllsivuiˊm
     ǩeeˊles+N+Pl+Abe: ǩeâllsitää
     
